Massachusetts, session 194th, S781.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
An individual or group health insurance policy providing prescription drug coverage in
the state must permit and apply a pro-rated daily cost-sharing rate to prescriptions dispensed by a
network pharmacy for a partial supply if the prescriber or pharmacist determines the fill or refill
to be in the best interest of the patient and the patient requests or agrees to a partial supply for the
purpose of synchronizing the patient’s medications.
No individual or group health insurance policy providing prescription drug coverage shall
deny coverage for the dispensing of a medication by a network pharmacy on the basis that the
dispensing is for a partial supply if the prescriber or pharmacist determines the fill or refill to be
in the best interest of the patient and the patient requests or agrees to a partial supply for the
purpose of synchronizing the patient’s medications. The individual or group health plan must
of 2

allow a pharmacy to override any denial codes indicating that a prescription is being refilled too
soon for the purposes of medication synchronization.
No individual or group health insurance policy providing prescription drug coverage shall
use payment structures incorporating pro-rated dispensing fees. Dispensing fees for partially
filled or refilled prescriptions shall be paid in full for each prescription dispensed regardless of
any pro-rated copay for the beneficiary or fee paid for alignment services.
of 2